Missouri, session 2026, HB2586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 370.020, 370.080, and 370.200, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 370.020, 370.080, and 370.200,
to read as follows:
370.020. The certificate of organization shall state:
(1) The name of the proposed credit union and the city, town, or village in which its
business office is located;
(2) The names and addresses of the subscribers to the certificate, and the number of
shares subscribed by each;
(3) A statement that organization as a credit union is desired under this particular law;
(4) The par value of the regular shares, which shall not exceed one hundred dollars;
(5) The par value of membership shares, if any, which shall not be less than [twenty-
five] one dollar nor more than one hundred dollars.
370.080. 1. The membership shall consist of the organizers and such persons,
societies, associations, copartnerships and corporations as have been duly elected to
membership and have subscribed to one or more general shares, or one membership share
and/or membership fee when required, and have paid for the same in the whole or in part,
with the entrance fee as required by the bylaws, and have complied with such other
requirements as the certificate of organization may contain.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2586 2
2. A credit union shall be composed of one or more groups of persons. The members
of each such individual group must share:
(1) A common occupation, association, employer or;
(2) A geographic area which may include all those persons who reside or work in a
city not within a county or a county, in which the main office of the credit union is located as
reported on the National Credit Union Administration (NCUA) 2006 year-end 5300 call
report, and counties contiguous to such areas as may be approved by the director. The
director shall not allow a geographic area credit union to expand beyond counties contiguous
to a city not within a county or a county in which its main office is located. The director shall
not allow a credit union to expand its geographic area due to a relocation of the credit union's
main office.
3. No individual shall be eligible for membership in a credit union on the basis of the
relationship of such individual to another person who is eligible for membership in such
credit union unless the individual is a member of the immediate family or household, as such
terms are defined by the commission, of such person. Except as provided in section 370.340,
once a person becomes a member of a credit union in accordance with this chapter, such
person or organization may remain a member of such credit union until the person or
organization chooses to withdraw from the membership of the credit union.
4. Each credit union may, at the option of the board, create one or more classes of
shares which shall be known as "membership share" representing the member's ownership
interest in the credit union on such terms and conditions as the board of directors may
determine, not inconsistent with the bylaws, provided that each membership share shall have
a par value of not less than [twenty-five] one dollar nor more than one hundred dollars. A
membership share shall not be pledged as security on any loan.
5. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, in the event of
liquidation of the assets of the credit union, the membership share shall be at risk, uninsured,
and shall be subordinated to the claims of all nonmembers and participate in the assets of the
credit union after all creditors and holders of all other shares, and the National Credit Union
Administration.
370.200. 1. The board of directors shall have the general management of the affairs,
funds, and records of the corporation, and unless they shall be specifically reserved to the
members or delegated to the president or operating manager, it shall be the special duty of the
directors:
(1) To act upon applications for membership in the credit union;
(2) To determine, from time to time, rates of interest which shall be charged on loans;

HB 2586 3
(3) To fix the maximum number of shares which may be held by and the maximum
amount, both secured and unsecured, which may be loaned to any one member, such
limitations to apply alike to all members; and
(4) To have charge of the investment of funds of the credit union, other than loans to
members, and to perform such other duties as the members may, from time to time, authorize.
2. Additionally, the board shall have the duty to:
(1) Authorize the employment and compensation of the chief executive officer;
(2) Approve an annual operating budget for the credit union;
(3) Declare dividends on regular shares;
(4) Accept and act upon resignations and determine and fill vacancies on the board of
directors, credit committee, and, if the bylaws so provide, the supervisory committee until the
election or appointment of qualified successors;
(5) Amend the bylaws except for those provisions in other sections of this chapter
specifically reserved for membership action; and
(6) Consider an appeal of a person denied membership by the credit union.
3. Unless specifically prohibited by the bylaws, directors may participate in and act at
any meeting of the board through the use of a telephone or other electronic means.
Participation in the meeting in this manner shall constitute attendance, and participation by
directors in a meeting may be in any combination of in-person, telephone, or other
electronic or virtual means, provided that all directors participating in the meeting can
communicate simultaneously. Any action taken during such meeting shall have the
same binding and legal effect as if the meeting were conducted in person. Votes and
other actions taken by the directors shall be conducted by electronic means, including
remote or online systems, provided that the board-approved procedures have been
established to verify the identity of voting directors and to ensure the integrity of the
process.
✔